Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2506
Sections, how construed.

Sections 25-2501 to 25-2506 shall be construed to be cumulative and independent legislation and complete in themselves.

Laws 1973, LB 187, § 6.